Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.162

State salary schedule.

The director of financial management shall adopt and maintain a state salary schedule. Such adoption and revision is subject to approval by the director in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 412.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.